Idaho statutes. Title 31 COUNTIES AND COUNTY LAW
Chapter 35
HOSPITALS FOR INDIGENT SICK

Sec.

§ 31-3501. Declaration of policy.

It is the policy of this state that each person, to the maximum extent possible, is responsible for his or her own medical care and that of his or her dependents and to that end, shall be encouraged to purchase his or her own medical insurance with coverage sufficient to prevent them from needing to request assistance pursuant to this chapter. However, in order to safeguard the public health, safety and welfare, and to provide suitable facilities and provisions for the care and hospitalization of persons in this state, and, in the case of medically indigent residents, to provide for the payment thereof, the respective counties of this state, and the board and the department shall have the duties and powers as hereinafter provided.

The county medically indigent program and the catastrophic health care cost program are payers of last resort. Therefore, applicants or third party applicants seeking financial assistance under the county medically indigent program and the catastrophic health care cost program shall be subject to the limitations and requirements as set forth herein.

§ 31-3502. Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the terms defined in this section shall have the following meaning, unless the context clearly indicates another meaning:

“Applicant” means any person who is requesting financial assistance under this chapter.

“Application” means the combined application for state and county medical assistance pursuant to sections 31-3504 and 31-3503E, Idaho Code. In this chapter an application for state and county medical assistance shall also mean an application for financial assistance.

“Board” means the board of the catastrophic health care cost program, as established in section 31-3517, Idaho Code.

“Case management” means coordination of services to help meet a patient’s health care needs, usually when the patient has a condition that requires multiple services.

“Catastrophic health care costs” means the cost of necessary medical services received by a recipient that, when paid at the then existing reimbursement rate, exceeds the total sum of eleven thousand dollars ($11,000) in the aggregate in any consecutive twelve (12) month period.

“Clerk” means the clerk of the respective counties or his or her designee.

“Completed application” shall include at a minimum the cover sheet requesting services, applicant information including diagnosis and requests for services and signatures, personal and financial information of the applicant and obligated person or persons, patient rights and responsibilities, releases and all other signatures required in the application.

“County commissioners” means the board of county commissioners in their respective counties.

“County hospital” means any county approved institution or facility for the care of sick persons.

“Department” means the department of health and welfare.

“Dependent” means any person whom a taxpayer claims as a dependent under the income tax laws of the state of Idaho.

“Emergency service” means a service provided for a medical condition in which sudden, serious and unexpected symptoms of illness or injury are sufficiently severe to necessitate or call for immediate medical care, including, but not limited to, severe pain, that the absence of immediate medical attention could reasonably be expected by a prudent person who possesses an average knowledge of health and medicine, to result in:

Placing the patient’s health in serious jeopardy;

Serious impairment to bodily functions; or

Serious dysfunction of any bodily organ or part.

“Hospital” means a facility licensed and regulated pursuant to sections 39-1301 through 39-1314, Idaho Code, or an out-of-state hospital providing necessary medical services for residents of Idaho, wherein a reciprocal agreement exists, in accordance with section 31-3503B, Idaho Code, excluding state institutions.

“Medicaid eligibility review” means the process used by the department to determine whether a person meets the criteria for medicaid coverage.

“Medical claim” means the itemized statements and standard forms used by hospitals and providers to satisfy centers for medicare and medicaid services (CMS) claims submission requirements.
(16) “Medical home” means a model of primary and preventive care delivery in which the patient has a continuous relationship with a personal physician in a physician directed medical practice that is whole person oriented and where care is integrated and coordinated.

“Medical home” means a model of primary and preventive care delivery in which the patient has a continuous relationship with a personal physician in a physician directed medical practice that is whole person oriented and where care is integrated and coordinated.

“Medically indigent” means any person who is in need of necessary medical services and who, if an adult, together with his or her spouse, or whose parents or guardian if a minor or dependent, does not have income and other resources available to him from whatever source sufficient to pay for necessary medical services. Nothing in this definition shall prevent the board and the county commissioners from requiring the applicant and obligated persons to reimburse the county and the catastrophic health care cost program, where appropriate, for all or a portion of their medical expenses, when investigation of their application pursuant to this chapter, determines their ability to do so.

A. “Necessary medical services” means health care services and supplies that:

Health care providers, exercising prudent clinical judgment, would provide to a person for the purpose of preventing, evaluating, diagnosing or treating an illness, injury, disease or its symptoms;

Are in accordance with generally accepted standards of medical practice;

Are clinically appropriate, in terms of type, frequency, extent, site and duration and are considered effective for the covered person’s illness, injury or disease;

Are not provided primarily for the convenience of the person, physician or other health care provider; and

Are the most cost-effective service or sequence of services or supplies, and at least as likely to produce equivalent therapeutic or diagnostic results for the person’s illness, injury or disease.

Medicare copayments and deductibles;

Services provided by, or available to, an applicant from state, federal and local health programs;

Medicaid copayments and deductibles; and

Drugs, devices or procedures primarily utilized for weight reduction and complications directly related to such drugs, devices or procedures.

“Obligated person” means the person or persons who are legally responsible for an applicant including, but not limited to, parents of minors or dependents.

“Primary and preventive health care” means the provision of professional health services that include health education and disease prevention, initial assessment of health problems, treatment of acute and chronic health problems and the overall management of an individual’s health care services.

“Provider” means any person, firm or corporation certified or licensed by the state of Idaho or holding an equivalent license or certification in another state, that provides necessary medical services to a patient requesting a medically indigent status determination or filing an application for financial assistance.
(22) “Recipient” means an individual determined eligible for financial assistance under this chapter.

“Recipient” means an individual determined eligible for financial assistance under this chapter.

“Reimbursement rate” means the unadjusted medicaid rate of reimbursement for medical charges allowed pursuant to title XIX of the social security act, as amended, that is in effect at the time service is rendered. The “reimbursement rate” shall mean ninety-five percent (95%) of the unadjusted medicaid rate.

“Resident” means a person with a home, house, place of abode, place of habitation, dwelling or place where he or she actually lived for a consecutive period of thirty (30) days or more within the state of Idaho. A resident does not include a person who comes into this state for temporary purposes, including, but not limited to, education, vacation, or seasonal labor. Entry into active military duty shall not change a person’s residence for the purposes of this chapter. Those physically present within the following facilities and institutions shall be residents of the county where they were residents prior to entering the facility or institution:

Correctional facilities;

Nursing homes or residential or assisted living facilities;

Other medical facility or institution.

“Resources” means all property, for which an applicant and/or an obligated person may be eligible or in which he or she may have an interest, whether tangible or intangible, real or personal, liquid or nonliquid, or pending, including, but not limited to, all forms of public assistance, crime victims compensation, worker’s compensation, veterans benefits, medicaid, medicare, supplemental security income (SSI), third party insurance, other insurance or apply for section 1011 of the medicare modernization act of 2003, if applicable, and any other property from any source. Resources shall include the ability of an applicant and obligated persons to pay for necessary medical services, excluding any interest charges, over a period of up to five (5) years starting on the date necessary medical services are first provided. For purposes of determining approval for medical indigency only, resources shall not include the value of the homestead on the applicant or obligated person’s residence, a burial plot, exemptions for personal property allowed in section 11-605(1) through (3), Idaho Code, and additional exemptions allowed by county resolution.

“Third party applicant” means a person other than an obligated person who completes, signs and files an application on behalf of a patient. A third party applicant who files an application on behalf of a patient pursuant to section 31-3504, Idaho Code, shall, if possible, deliver a copy of the application to the patient within three (3) business days after filing the application.

“Third party insurance” means casualty insurance, disability insurance, health insurance, life insurance, marine and transportation insurance, motor vehicle insurance, property insurance or any other insurance coverage that may pay for a resident’s medical bills.

B. Necessary medical services shall not include the following:

(a) Bone marrow transplants;

(b) Organ transplants;

(c) Elective, cosmetic and/or experimental procedures;

(d) Services related to, or provided by, residential, skilled nursing, assisted living and/or shelter care facilities;

(e) Normal, uncomplicated pregnancies, excluding caesarean section, and childbirth well-baby care;

§ 31-3503. Powers and duties of county commissioners.

The county commissioners in their respective counties shall, under such limitations and restrictions as are prescribed by law:

Pay for necessary medical services for the medically indigent residents of their counties as provided in this chapter and as approved by the county commissioners at the reimbursement rate up to the total sum of eleven thousand dollars ($11,000) in the aggregate per resident in any consecutive twelve (12) month period or contract for the provision of necessary medical services pursuant to sections 31-3520 and 31-3521, Idaho Code.

Have the right to contract with providers, transfer patients, negotiate provider agreements, conduct utilization management or any portion thereof, pay for authorized expenses directly, or indirectly through the use of alternative programs, that would assist in managing costs of providing health care for indigent persons, and all other powers incident to the county’s duties created by this chapter.

Cooperate with the department, the board and contractors retained by the department or the board to provide services including, but not limited to, medicaid eligibility review and utilization management on behalf of the counties and the board.

Have the jurisdiction and power to provide county hospitals and public general hospitals for the county and others who are sick, injured, maimed, aged and infirm and to erect, enlarge, purchase, lease, or otherwise acquire, and to officer, maintain and improve hospitals, hospital grounds, nurses’ homes, shelter care facilities and residential or assisted living facilities as defined in section 39-3301, Idaho Code, superintendent’s quarters, medical clinics, as that term is defined in section 39-1319, Idaho Code, medical clinic grounds or any other necessary buildings, and to equip the same, and to replace equipment, and for this purpose said commissioners may levy an additional tax of not to exceed six hundredths percent (.06%) of the market value for assessment purposes on all taxable property within the county. The term “public general hospitals” as used in this subsection shall be construed to include nursing homes.

§ 31-3503A. Powers and duties of the board.

The board shall, under such limitations and restrictions as are prescribed by law:

Pay for the cost of necessary medical services for a medically indigent resident, as provided in this chapter, where the cost of necessary medical services when paid at the reimbursement rate exceeds the total sum of eleven thousand dollars ($11,000) in the aggregate per resident in any consecutive twelve (12) month period;

Have the right to negotiate provider agreements, contract for utilization management or any portion thereof, pay for authorized expenses directly, or indirectly through the use of alternative programs, that would assist in managing costs of providing health care for indigent persons, and all other powers incident to the board’s duties created by this chapter;

Cooperate with the department, respective counties of the state and contractors retained by the department or county commissioners to provide services including, but not limited to, eligibility review and utilization management on behalf of the counties and the board;

Require, as the board deems necessary, annual reports from each county and each hospital including, but not limited to, the following:

From each county and for each applicant:

Case number and the date services began;

Age;

Residence;

Sex;

Diagnosis;

Income;

Family size;

Amount of costs incurred including provider, legal and administrative charges;

Approval or denial; and

Reasons for denial.

From each hospital:

990 tax forms or comparable information;

Cost of charges where charitable care was provided; and

Administrative and legal costs incurred in processing claims under this chapter.

Authorize all disbursements from the catastrophic health care cost program in accordance with the provisions of this chapter;

Make and enter into contracts;

Develop and submit a proposed budget setting forth the amount necessary to perform its functions and prepare an annual report;

Perform such other duties as set forth in the laws of this state; and

Conduct examinations, investigations, audits and hear testimony and take proof, under oath or affirmation, at public or private hearings, on any matter necessary to fulfill its duties.

§ 31-3503B. Reciprocal agreements — Out-of-state treatment.

The governor of the state of Idaho or his or her designee is empowered to negotiate reciprocal agreements with other states for the provision of necessary medical services for residents of this and other states.

No payment shall be made for necessary medical services to an out-of-state provider unless a reciprocal agreement has been entered into by the governor of this state, or unless contracted for pursuant to sections 31-3520 and 31-3522 [31-3521], Idaho Code.

§ 31-3503C. Powers and duties of the department.

The department shall:

Design and manage a utilization management program and third party recovery system for the medically indigent program.

Have the authority to engage one (1) or more contractors or third party administrators to perform the duties assigned to it pursuant to this chapter including, but not limited to, utilization management and third party recovery for the medically indigent program.

Implement a medicaid eligibility determination process for all potential applicants.

Develop and implement by July 1, 2010, in cooperation with the Idaho association of counties and the Idaho hospital association, a uniform form to be used for both the initial review, pursuant to section 31-3503E, Idaho Code, and the application for financial assistance pursuant to section 31-3504, Idaho Code.

Cooperate with the counties and the board in providing the services required of it pursuant to this chapter.

Promulgate rules to implement its duties and responsibilities under the provisions of this chapter.

§ 31-3503D. County participation and contribution.

Every county shall fully participate in the utilization management program and third party recovery system and shall contribute to the medicaid eligibility review, utilization management program and third party recovery costs incurred by the department pursuant to section 31-3503E, Idaho Code. The contribution of each county shall be calculated by the department as defined in rule.

§ 31-3503E. Medicaid eligibility determination.

The department shall:

Require the hospital to undertake an initial review of a patient upon stabilization to determine whether the patient may be medically indigent. If the hospital’s initial review determines that the patient may be medically indigent, require that the hospital transmit a completed combined application for state and county medical assistance and a written request for medicaid eligibility determination to the department any time within thirty-one (31) days of the date of admission.

Undertake a determination of possible medicaid eligibility upon receipt from the hospital of the completed combined application for state and county medical assistance and written request for medicaid eligibility determination. The department will use the medicaid eligibility guidelines in place as of the date of submission of the completed combined application for state and county medical assistance, apply categorical and financial eligibility requirements and use all sources available to the department to obtain verification in making the determination.

In order to ascertain medicaid eligibility, require the patient or the obligated person to cooperate with the department according to its rules in investigating, providing documentation, submitting to an interview and notifying the department of the receipt of resources after the initial review form has been submitted to the department.

Promptly notify the patient of medicaid eligibility.

Act on the completed combined application for state and county medical assistance as an application for medicaid. An application for medicaid shall not be an application for financial assistance pursuant to section 31-3504, Idaho Code. Except as provided in this section, an application for financial assistance shall not be an application for medicaid.

Utilize the verification and cooperation requirement in department rule to complete the eligibility determination.

Notify the patient or the obligated person, the hospital or the clerk of a denial and the reason therefor. If, based on its medicaid eligibility review, the department determines that the patient is not eligible for medicaid, transmit a copy of the completed combined application for state and county medical assistance to the clerk. Denial of medicaid eligibility is not a determination of medical indigence.

Make income and resource information obtained from the medicaid eligibility determination process available to the county to assist in determination of medical indigency at the time the department notifies the county of the final medicaid eligibility determination.

The completed combined application for state and county medical assistance shall be deemed consent for providers, the hospital, the department, respective counties and the board to exchange information pertaining to the applicant’s health and finances for the purposes of determining medicaid eligibility or medical indigency.

§ 31-3503F. Medical home.

The department shall create by rule a community-based system in which a medically indigent patient may be referred to a medical home upon discharge from hospital. The medical home shall provide ongoing primary and preventive care and case management with periodic reports to the department regarding the medically indigent patient’s health status and participation in the patient’s treatment plan. Appropriate reimbursement to the medical home provider for patient primary and preventive care services employing utilization management and case management shall be coordinated by the department.

§ 31-3504. Application for financial assistance.

Except as provided for in section 31-3503E, Idaho Code, an applicant or third party applicant requesting assistance under this chapter shall complete a written application. The truth of the matters contained in the completed application shall be sworn to by the applicant or third party applicant. The completed application shall be deemed consent for the providers, the hospital, the department, respective counties and board to exchange information pertaining to the applicant’s health and finances for the purposes of determining medicaid eligibility or medical indigency. The completed application shall be signed by the applicant or third party applicant, an authorized representative of the applicant, or, if the applicant is incompetent or incapacitated, someone acting responsibly for the applicant and filed in the clerk’s office. If the clerk determines that the patient may be eligible for medicaid, within one (1) business day of the filing of the completed application in the clerk’s office, the clerk shall transmit a copy of the application and a written request for medicaid eligibility determination to the department.

If, based on its medicaid eligibility review, the department determines that the patient is eligible for medicaid, the department shall act on the application as an application for medicaid.

If, based on its medicaid eligibility review, the department determines that the patient is not eligible for medicaid, the department shall notify the clerk of the denial and the reason therefor, in accordance with section 31-3503E, Idaho Code. Denial of medicaid eligibility is not a determination of medical indigence.

If a third party completed application is filed, the application shall be presented in the same form and manner as set forth in subsection (1) of this section.

Follow-up necessary medical services based on a treatment plan, for the same condition, preapproved by the county commissioners, may be provided for a maximum of six (6) months from the date of the original application without requiring an additional application; however, a request for additional treatment not specified in the approved treatment plan shall be filed with the clerk ten (10) days prior to receiving services. Beyond the six (6) months, requests for additional treatment related to an original diagnosis in accordance with a preapproved treatment plan shall be filed ten (10) days prior to receiving services and an updated application may be requested by the county commissioners.

Upon application for financial assistance pursuant to this chapter an automatic lien shall attach to all real and personal property of the applicant and on insurance benefits to which the applicant may become entitled. The lien shall also attach to any additional resources to which it may legally attach not covered in this section. The lien created by this section may be, in the discretion of the county commissioners and the board, perfected as to real property and fixtures by recording a document entitled: notice of lien and application for financial assistance, in any county recorder’s office in this state in which the applicant and obligated person own property. The notice of lien and application for financial assistance shall be recorded as provided herein within thirty (30) days from receipt of an application, and such lien, if so recorded, shall have a priority date as of the date the necessary medical services were provided. The lien created by this section may also be, in the discretion of the county commissioners and the board, perfected as to personal property by filing with the secretary of state within thirty (30) days of receipt of an application, a notice of application in substantially the same manner as a filing under chapter 9, title 28, Idaho Code, except that such notice need not be signed and no fee shall be required, and, if so filed, such lien shall have the priority date as of the date the necessary medical services were provided. An application for assistance pursuant to this chapter shall waive any confidentiality granted by state law to the extent necessary to carry out the intent of this section.
(5) In accordance with rules and procedures promulgated by the department or the board, each hospital and provider seeking reimbursement under this chapter shall submit all medical records and medical claims relevant to necessary medical services provided for an applicant in a standard or uniform format to the county clerk of the obligated county within ten (10) days after receiving a request from the county clerk; provided that, within the ten (10) day period if a provider presents a written request for suspension of the investigation, the investigation of the application shall be suspended for up to thirty (30) days. Upon receipt of the requested documentation, the investigation shall resume. A copy of the results of the reviewed medical records and medical claims shall be transmitted by the department’s or the board’s contractor to the clerk of the obligated county. Failure to provide the medical records and medical claims within the initial ten (10) day period and the suspension period, if any, shall result in denial of the application.

§ 31-3505. Time and manner of filing applications for financial assistance.

Applications for financial assistance shall be filed according to the following time limits. Filing is complete upon receipt by the clerk or the department.

A completed application for nonemergency necessary medical services shall be filed with the clerk ten (10) days prior to receiving services from the provider or the hospital.

A completed application for emergency necessary medical services shall be filed with the clerk any time within thirty-one (31) days beginning with the first day of the provision of necessary medical services from the provider, except as provided in subsection (3) of this section.

In the case of hospitalization, a completed application for emergency necessary medical services shall be filed with the department any time within thirty-one (31) days of the date of admission.

Requests for additional treatment related to an original diagnosis in accordance with a preapproved treatment plan shall be filed ten (10) days prior to receiving services.

A delayed application for necessary medical services may be filed up to one hundred eighty (180) days beginning with the first day of the provision of necessary medical services provided that:

Written documentation is included with the application or no later than forty-five (45) days after an application has been filed showing that a bona fide application or claim has been filed for social security disability insurance, supplemental security income, third party insurance, medicaid, medicare, crime victims compensation, and/or worker’s compensation. A bona fide application means that:

The application was timely filed within the appropriate agency’s application or claim time period; and

Given the circumstances of the patient and/or obligated persons, the patient and/or obligated persons, and given the information available at the time the application or claim for other resources is filed, would reasonably be expected to meet the eligibility criteria for such resources; and

The application was filed with the appropriate agency in such a time and manner that, if approved, it would provide for payment coverage of the bills included in the county application; and

In the discretion of the county commissioners, bills on a delayed application which would not have been covered by a successful application or timely claim to the other resource(s) may be denied by the county commissioners as untimely; and

In the event an application is filed for supplemental security income, an Idaho medicaid application must also have been filed within the department of health and welfare’s application or claim time period to provide payment coverage of eligible bills included in the county application.

Failure by the patient and/or obligated persons to complete the application process described in this section, up to and including any reasonable appeal of any denial of benefits, with the applicable program noted in paragraph (a) of this subsection, shall result in denial of the application.

No application for financial assistance under the county medically indigent program or the catastrophic health care cost program shall be approved by the county commissioners or the board unless the provider or the hospital completes the application process and complies with the time limits prescribed by this chapter.

Any application or request which fails to meet the provisions of this section, and/or other provisions of this chapter, shall be denied.

In the event that a county determines that a different county is obligated, such county shall notify the applicant or third party applicant of the denial and shall also notify the county it believes to be the obligated county and provide the basis for the determination. An application may be filed by the applicant or third party applicant in the indicated county within thirty (30) days of the date of the initial county denial.

§ 31-3505A. Investigation of application by the clerk.

The clerk shall interview the applicant and investigate the information provided on the application, along with all other required information, in accordance with the procedures established by the county commissioners, the board and this chapter. The clerk shall promptly notify the applicant, or third party filing an application on behalf of an applicant, of any material information missing from the application which, if omitted, may cause the application to be denied for incompleteness. In addition, any provider requesting notification shall be notified at the same time. When necessary, such persons as may be deemed essential, may be compelled by the clerk to give testimony and produce documents and other evidence under oath in order to complete the investigation. The clerk is hereby authorized to issue subpoenas to carry out the intent of this provision and to otherwise compel compliance in accordance with provisions of Idaho law.

The applicant and third party filing an application on behalf of an applicant to the extent they have knowledge, shall have a duty to cooperate with the clerk in investigating, providing documentation, submitting to an interview and ascertaining eligibility and shall have a continuing duty to notify the obligated county of the receipt of resources after an application has been filed.

The clerk shall have twenty (20) days to complete the investigation of an application for nonemergency necessary medical services.

The clerk shall have forty-five (45) days to complete the investigation of an application for emergency necessary medical utilization management services or a portion thereof.

In the case of follow-up treatment, the clerk shall have ten (10) days to complete an interview on a request for additional treatment to update the financial and other information contained in a previous application for an original diagnosis in accordance with a treatment plan previously approved by the county commissioners.

Upon completion of the interview and investigation of the application or request, a statement of the clerk’s findings shall be filed with the county commissioners. Such findings of indigency shall start on the date necessary medical services are first provided.

§ 31-3505B. Approval by the county commissioners.

The county commissioners shall approve an application for financial assistance if it determines that necessary medical services have been or will be provided to a medically indigent resident in accordance with this chapter; provided, the amount approved when paid, at the reimbursement rate, by the obligated county for any medically indigent resident shall not exceed the lesser of:

The total sum of eleven thousand dollars ($11,000) in the aggregate per resident in any consecutive twelve (12) month period; or

The reimbursement for services recommended by any or all of the utilization management activities pursuant to section 31-3502, Idaho Code.

§ 31-3505C. Initial decision by the county commissioners.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, the county commissioners shall make an initial determination to approve or deny an application within fifteen (15) days from receipt of the clerk’s statement and within five (5) days from receiving the clerk’s statement on a request. The initial determination to approve or deny an application shall be mailed to the applicant or the third party making application on behalf of the applicant, as the case may be, and each provider listed on the application within five (5) days of the initial determination.

The county commissioners shall hold in suspension an initial determination to deny an application, if the sole basis for the denial is that the applicant may be eligible for other forms of public assistance, crime victims compensation, worker’s compensation, veterans benefits, medicaid, medicare, supplemental security income, third party insurance or other insurance. The decision to hold an initial determination to deny an application in suspension shall be mailed to the applicant or the third party making application on behalf of the applicant, as the case may be, and each provider listed on the application within five (5) days of the decision to suspend.

If an applicant is subsequently determined to be eligible for other forms of public assistance, crime victims compensation, worker’s compensation, veterans benefits, medicaid, medicare, supplemental security income, third party insurance or other insurance, the application shall be denied. The applicant or the third party making application on behalf of the applicant, as the case may be, and each provider listed on the application shall be notified within five (5) days of the denial.

If an applicant is subsequently determined not to be eligible for other forms of public assistance, crime victims compensation, worker’s compensation, veterans benefits, medicaid, medicare, supplemental security income, third party insurance or other insurance, the application for financial assistance shall be approved. The applicant or the third party making application on behalf of the applicant, as the case may be, and each provider listed on the application shall be notified within five (5) days of the approval.

If the county commissioners hold in suspension an initial determination to deny an application, any time limitation used in this chapter shall be tolled and not deemed to run during the period of suspension.

§ 31-3505D. Appeal of initial determination denying an application.

An applicant, provider or third party applicant may appeal an initial determination of the county commissioners denying an application by filing a written notice of appeal with the county commissioners within twenty-eight (28) days of the date of the denial. If no appeal is filed within the time allowed, the initial determination of the county commissioners denying an application shall become final.

§ 31-3505E. Hearing on appeal of initial determination denying an application.

The county commissioners shall hold a hearing on the appeal within seventy-five (75) days of receipt of the notice of appeal. The hearing may be continued by the county commissioners for not more than forty-five (45) days from the date of the hearing to allow the applicant to produce additional information, documents, records, testimony or other evidence required in the discretion of the county commissioners or to allow a decision on eligibility of the applicant for benefits to be reached by another agency such as, but not limited to, the social security administration or the department. The hearing may be continued for additional periods by mutual stipulation of the county commissioners and the applicant. The county commissioners shall make a final determination within thirty (30) days of the conclusion of the hearing. The final determination of the county commissioners denying an application shall be mailed to the applicant, or the third party making application on behalf of an applicant, as the case may be and each provider listed on the application, within five (5) days of the date of the final determination.

§ 31-3505F. Arbitration.

In the event that a county determines that a service is not a necessary medical service, a provider may submit the issue to a panel for arbitration as follows:

Within thirty (30) days of the determination, the county commissioners and the provider shall each appoint one (1) licensed medical or osteopathic doctor with expertise in the condition treated or to be treated. The two (2) appointees shall jointly select a third medical or osteopathic licensed doctor with equivalent expertise. The panel shall review such information as it deems necessary and render a decision within thirty (30) days as to whether the covered service is a necessary medical service.

There shall be no judicial or other review or appeal of the findings of the panel. No party shall be obligated to comply with or otherwise be affected or prejudiced by the proposals, conclusions or suggestions of the panel or any member or segment thereof; however, in the interest of due consideration being given to such proceedings and in the interest of encouraging consideration of claims informally and without the necessity of litigation, the applicable statute of limitations shall be tolled and not deemed to run during the time that such a claim is pending before the panel and for thirty (30) days thereafter.

Expenses incurred by the members of the panel in the performance of their duties will be borne by the respective parties making their appointment, and expenses of the third member shall be divided equally among the respective parties.

§ 31-3505G. Petition for judicial review of final determination.

If, after a hearing as provided in section 31-3505E, Idaho Code, the final determination of the county commissioners is to deny an application for financial assistance, the applicant, or a third party applicant, may seek judicial review of the final determination of the county commissioners in the manner provided in section 31-1506, Idaho Code.